California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(History: Added by renumbering Section 779.1 (as added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 796) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 211.)
-------------------------------------------

779.3.

(a) A gas or electrical corporation shall not disconnect service for nonpayment by a residential customer receiving a medical baseline allowance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 739 who is financially unable to pay for service within the normal payment period, who is willing to enter into an amortization agreement with the corporation pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 779 with respect to all charges that the customer is unable to pay, and who meets any of the following criteria:

(1) The customer or a member of the customer’s household is under hospice care at home.

(2) The customer or a member of the customer’s household depends upon life-support equipment, as defined in paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (c) of Section 739.

(3) The customer or a member of the customer’s household has a life-threatening condition or illness, and a licensed physician, a person licensed pursuant to the Osteopathic Initiative Act, a physician assistant practicing within his or her scope of practice in compliance with the Physician Assistant Practice Act (Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code), or a nurse practitioner certifies that gas or electric service is medically necessary to sustain the life of the person or prevent deterioration of the person’s medical condition.

(b) The commission may identify strategies for reasonable cost recovery by a gas or electrical corporation for costs incurred in providing gas or electric service to customers whom the gas or electrical corporation was unable to disconnect due to compliance with this
 section.

(c) A gas or electrical corporation may institute a verification process to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 518, Sec. 2.   (SB 1338)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

779.4.

(a) For purposes of this section, “energy utility” means an electrical corporation, a gas corporation, or an entity that is both an electrical corporation and a gas corporation.

(b) The commission shall develop rules requiring each of the four energy utilities that have the greatest number of customers in California to demonstrate that they are working with the medical community to increase marketing and outreach to persons eligible for the medical baseline allowance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 739.

(c) The commission shall consider policies to increase marketing and outreach programs to customers eligible for the medical baseline allowance pursuant to subdivision (c) of
 Section 739, in coordination with county public health departments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 518, Sec. 3.   (SB 1338)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

779.5.

The decision of an electrical, gas, heat, telephone, or water corporation to require a new residential applicant to deposit a sum of money with the corporation prior to establishing an account and furnishing service shall be based solely upon the credit worthiness of the applicant as determined by the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1066, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

779.6.

(a) An electrical or gas corporation shall restore service to a residential customer whose service was previously terminated for nonpayment of delinquent amounts upon the customer entering into either an amortization agreement described in subdivision (c) of Section 779 or any other arrearage payment plan determined by the commission.

(b) To the extent authorized by commission rules, the restoration of service shall occur as follows:

(1) Within 24 hours of the payment for remote reconnections.

(2) Within one business day for field reconnections, except in situations relating to safety or extreme
 weather.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 600, Sec. 1.   (SB 1142)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

779.7.

(a) On or before July 1, 2025, the commission shall, in a new or existing proceeding, determine whether to direct electrical and gas corporations to take into account a customer’s ability to pay in any of the following circumstances:

(1) Before terminating service due to nonpayment.

(2) Before terminating service for a customer on an amortization agreement.

(3) In reconnecting service for a residential customer whose service was previously terminated for nonpayment.

(b) In determining whether to direct electrical corporations to consider a customer’s
 ability to pay before terminating service, the commission shall consider whether to limit the amount an electrical corporation can collect up to an amount specified by the commission.

(c) The commission shall consider impacts to participating and nonparticipating customers to inform the determinations made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 600, Sec. 2.   (SB 1142)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

780.

No electrical, gas, heat, or water corporation shall, by reason of delinquency in the payment of its charges, terminate service on any Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or at any time during which the business offices of the corporation are not open to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 888, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

780.5.

The commission shall require every residential unit in an apartment house or similar multiunit residential structure, condominium, and mobilehome park for which a building permit has been obtained on or after July 1, 1982, other than a dormitory or other housing accommodation provided by any postsecondary educational institution for its students or employees and other than farmworker housing, to be individually metered for electrical and gas service, except that separate metering for gas service is not required for residential units which are not equipped with gas
 appliances requiring venting or are equipped with only vented decorative appliances or which receive the majority of energy used for water or space heating from a solar energy system or through cogeneration technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 694, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

781.

(a) (1) Each water corporation with 500 or more service connections that is not subject to the requirements of Section 525, 526, 527, or 528 of the Water Code shall install, on and after January 1, 2010, a water meter on each new service connection.

(2) Each water corporation with 500 or more service connections as of January
 1, 2010, that is not subject to the requirements of Section 526, 527, or 528 of the Water Code, shall install a water meter upon each unmetered service connection by January 1, 2025.

(3) Each water corporation with less than 500 service connections as of January 1, 2010, that thereafter reaches 500 or more service connections and that is not subject to the requirements of Section 526, 527, or 528 of the Water Code, shall, within 10 years of attaining that threshold, install a water meter upon each unmetered service connection.

(4) Each water corporation that is subject to the requirements of Section 525, 526, 527, or 528 of the Water Code shall install water meters pursuant to those sections.

(b) (1) Each water corporation that has installed water meters, or caused water meters to be installed,
 that is not subject to Section 525, 526, 527, or 528 of the Water Code, shall, on and after January 1, 2015, charge customers for potable water based on the actual volume of deliveries, as measured by the water meter. This paragraph does not limit the authority of the commission to authorize a water corporation that promotes conservation through volumetric water pricing to determine and impose a rate, fee, or charge in addition to the charge for the actual volume of metered water delivered.

(2) Each water corporation that is subject to Section 525, 526, 527, or 528 of the Water Code shall charge customers for potable water based on the actual volume of deliveries, as measured by the water meter, consistent with the requirements of those sections.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), in order to provide customers with experience in volume-based water service charges, a water
 corporation that is subject to paragraph (1) may delay, for one annual seasonal cycle of water use, the use of meter-based charges for service connections that are being converted from nonvolume-based billing to volume-based billing.

(c) A water corporation shall recover the cost of providing services related to the purchase, installation, operation, and maintenance of water meters in rates, fees, or charges. Rates, fees, or charges recovered by the water corporation pursuant to this section are subject to approval by the commission pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 451) of Chapter 3 and Article 2 (commencing with Section 727) of this chapter.

(d) The commission shall ensure that each water corporation that is subject to the requirements of this section or the requirements of the Water Measurement Law (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 500) of Division 1 of the Water
 Code) comply with those requirements.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 495, Sec. 2.   (AB 975)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

781.5.

The commission may require a water corporation that furnishes potable water for residential, commercial, industrial, or institutional use through less than 500 service connections that is not subject to the requirements of Section 526, 527, or 528 of the Water Code, or a residential, commercial, industrial, or institutional customer of the corporation, to install a water meter at any water service connection between the water system of the corporation and the customer if after a public
 hearing held within the service area of the corporation, the commission finds, based upon the evidence presented at that hearing, that any of the following are true:

(a) Metering will be cost effective within the service area of the corporation.

(b) Metering will result in a reduction in water consumption within the service area of the corporation.

(c) The costs of metering will not impose an unreasonable financial burden on customers within the service area of the corporation unless it is found to be necessary to ensure continuation of an adequate water supply within the service area of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 495, Sec. 3.   (AB 975)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

782.

In order to encourage the development of geothermal resources in the State of California, the commission may, upon a complaint by a geothermal energy producer, prohibit any electrical corporation from curtailing the generation, production, or transmission of electricity from a geothermal powerplant operated by such corporation, if the commission deems that such curtailment is not in the public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1271.)
-------------------------------------------

783.

(a) The commission shall continue to enforce the rules governing the extension of service by gas and electrical corporations to new residential, commercial, agricultural, and industrial customers in effect on January 1, 1982, except that the commission shall amend the existing rules to permit applicants for service to install extensions in accordance with subdivision (f). Except for periodic review provisions of existing rules, and amendments to permit installations by an applicant’s contractor, the commission shall not investigate amending these rules or issue any orders or decisions that amend these rules, unless the investigation or proceeding for the issuance of the order or decision is conducted pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) Whenever the commission institutes
 an investigation into the terms and conditions for the extension of services provided by gas and electrical corporations to new or existing customers, or considers issuing an order or decision amending those terms or conditions, the commission shall make written findings on all of the following issues:

(1) The economic effect of the line and service extension terms and conditions upon agriculture, residential housing, mobilehome parks, rural customers, urban customers, employment, and commercial and industrial building and development.

(2) The effect of requiring new or existing customers applying for an extension to an electrical or gas corporation to provide transmission or distribution facilities for other customers who will apply to receive line and service extensions in the future.

(3) The effect of requiring a
 new or existing customer applying for an extension to an electrical or gas corporation to be responsible for the distribution of, reinforcements of, relocations of, or additions to that gas or electrical corporation.

(4) The economic effect of the terms and conditions upon projects, including redevelopment projects, funded or sponsored by cities, counties, or districts.

(5) The effect of the line and service extension regulations, and any modifications to them, on existing ratepayers.

(6) The effect of the line and service extension regulations, and any modifications to them, on the consumption and conservation of energy.

(7) The extent to which there is cost-justification for a special line and service extension allowance for agriculture.

(c) The commission shall request the assistance of appropriate state agencies and departments in conducting any investigation or proceeding pursuant to subdivision (b), including, but not limited to, the Transportation Agency, the Department of Food and Agriculture, the Department of Consumer Affairs, the Bureau of Real Estate, and the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(d) Any new order or decision issued pursuant to an investigation or proceeding conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall become effective on July 1 of the year that follows the year when the new order or decision is adopted by the commission, so as to ensure that the public has at least six months to consider the new order or decision.

(e) The commission shall conduct any investigation or proceeding pursuant to subdivision (b) within the
 commission’s existing budget, and any state agency or department that is requested by the commission to provide assistance pursuant to subdivision (c) shall also provide the assistance within the agency’s or department’s existing budget.

(f) An electrical or gas corporation shall permit a new or existing customer who applies for an extension of service from that corporation to install a gas or electric extension in accordance with the regulations of the commission and applicable specifications of that electrical or gas corporation consistent with subdivision (g).

(g) (1) Only those construction and design specifications, standards, terms, and conditions that are applicable to a new extension-of-service project by an electrical or gas corporation on the date the application is approved for the extension of service apply to the new project for the 18 months
 following the approval date of the application.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an electrical or gas corporation may adopt modifications to construction and design specifications, standards, terms, and conditions applicable to a new extension-of-service project in accordance with any of the following:

(A) An order or decision of the commission or any other state or federal agency with jurisdiction.

(B) A work order issued by the electrical or gas corporation to implement construction or design changes necessitated by a customer-driven scope of work modification.

(C) A material-related design change identified by the electrical or gas corporation to remedy a construction material defect that could pose a risk to public safety.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “The date the application is approved” means the earlier of either the effective date of the contract for the extension of gas or electric service or the date when the utility first invoices the customer for the extension of gas or electric service.

(2) “Customer-driven scope of work modification” means those modifications required to accommodate the construction and design needs of a new extension-of-service project for a specific customer.

(3) “Invoice” means when an electrical or gas corporation presents an offer to the customer for the extension of gas or electric service in response to an application for an extension of service submitted pursuant to subdivision
 (f).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 252.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

783.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings: 

(1) “Disadvantaged community” means a San Joaquin Valley community that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) At least 25 percent of residential households with electrical service are enrolled in the CARE program pursuant to Section 739.1.

(B) Has a population greater than 100 persons within its geographic boundaries as identified by the most recent United States Census or a community survey.

(C) Has geographic boundaries no farther than seven miles from the nearest natural gas pipeline operated by a gas corporation.

(2) “San Joaquin Valley” means the counties of Fresno, Kern, Kings, Madera, Merced, San Joaquin, Stanislaus, and Tulare.

(b) No later than March 31, 2015, the commission shall initiate a new proceeding to do all of the following:

(1) Identify disadvantaged communities based on the criteria specified in subdivision (a).

(2) Analyze the economic
 feasibility of the following options:

(A) Extending natural gas pipelines to those disadvantaged communities.

(B) Increasing subsidies for electricity for residential customers in those disadvantaged communities.

(C) Other alternatives that would increase access to affordable energy in those disadvantaged communities that the commission deems appropriate.

(c) The commission shall determine whether any of the options analyzed in the proceeding would increase access to affordable energy in a cost-effective manner. For these options, the commission shall take appropriate action and determine appropriate funding sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 616, Sec. 2.   (AB 2672)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

784.

For each gas corporation, the commission shall adopt pipeline access rules that ensure that each gas corporation provides nondiscriminatory open access to its gas pipeline system to any party for the purposes of physically interconnecting with the gas pipeline system and effectuating the delivery of gas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 602, Sec. 6.   (AB 1900)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

784.1.

(a) The Legislature requests that the California Council on Science and Technology undertake and complete a study analyzing the regional and gas corporation specific issues relating to minimum heating value and maximum siloxane specifications for biomethane before it can be injected into common carrier gas pipelines, including those specifications adopted in Sections 4.4.3.3 and 4.4.4 of commission Decision 14-01-034 (January 16, 2014), Decision Regarding the
 Biomethane Implementation Tasks in Assembly Bill 1900. The study shall consider and evaluate other states’ standards, the source of biomethane, the dilution of biomethane after it is injected into the pipeline, the equipment and technology upgrades required to meet the minimum heating value specifications, including the impacts of those specifications on the cost, volume of biomethane sold, equipment operation, and safety. The study shall also consider whether different sources of biogas should have different standards or if all sources should adhere to one standard for the minimum heating value and maximum permissible level of siloxanes. The study shall develop the best science reasonably available and not merely be a literature review. In order to meet the state’s goals for reducing emissions of greenhouse gases and short-lived climate pollutants and the state’s goals for promoting the use of renewable energy resources in place of burning fossil fuels, the California Council on Science and Technology, if
 it agrees to undertake and complete the study, shall complete the study within nine months of entering into a contract to undertake and complete the study.

(b) (1) If the California Council on Science and Technology agrees to undertake and complete the study pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall require each gas corporation operating common carrier pipelines in California to proportionately contribute to the expenses to undertake the study pursuant to Sections 740 and 740.1. The commission may modify the monetary incentives made available pursuant to commission Decision 15-06-029 (June 11, 2015), Decision Regarding the Costs of Compliance with Decision 14-01-034 and Adoption of Biomethane Promotion Policies and Program, to allocate some of the moneys that would be made available for incentives to instead be made available to pay for the costs of the study so as to not further burden ratepayers with additional
 expense.

(2) The commission’s authority pursuant to paragraph (1) shall apply notwithstanding whether the gas corporation has proposed the program pursuant to Section 740.1.

(c) If the California Council on Science and Technology agrees to undertake and complete the study pursuant to subdivision (a), within six months of its completion, the commission shall reevaluate its requirements and standards adopted pursuant to Section 25421 of the Health and Safety Code relative to the requirements and standards for biomethane to be injected into common carrier pipelines and, if appropriate, change those requirements and standards or adopt new requirements and standards, giving due deference to the conclusions and recommendations made in the study by the California Council on Science and Technology.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 341, Sec. 11.   (SB 840)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

784.2.

Before the exhaustion of the funds made available pursuant to the monetary incentive program for biomethane projects adopted in Decision 15-06-029 (June 11, 2015), Decision Regarding the Costs of Compliance with Decision 14-01-034 and Adoption of Biomethane Promotion Policies and Program, and no later than July 1, 2019, the commission shall open a proceeding to consider options to further the goals of Section 399.24, including consideration of whether to allow recovery in rates of the costs of investments to do each of the following:

(a) Ensure that prudent and reasonable investments for infrastructure pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) provide a direct benefit, such as safety, reliability, affordability, or reducing emissions of greenhouse gases, to all classes of ratepayers and are
 in the interests of all classes of ratepayers.

(b) Facilitate direct investment in the procurement and installation of utility infrastructure necessary to achieve interconnection between the natural gas transmission and distribution pipeline network and biomethane generation and collection equipment, and of gathering lines for a dairy cluster biomethane project.

(c) Provide for the installation of utility infrastructure to achieve interconnection with facilities that generate biomethane.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 598, Sec. 1.   (AB 3187)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

785.

To the extent consistent with federal law and regulation and contractual obligations regarding other available gas, the commission shall, in consultation with the Division of Oil and Gas of the Department of Conservation and with the Energy Commission, encourage, as a first priority, the increased production of gas in this state, including gas produced from that area of the Pacific Ocean along the coast of California commonly known as the outer continental shelf, and shall require, after a hearing, every gas corporation to purchase that gas which is compatible with the corporation’s gas plant and which is produced in this state having an actual delivered cost, measured in equivalent heat units, equal to or less than other available gas, unless this requirement will result in higher overall costs of gas or other consequences adverse to the interests of
 gas customers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 28.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

785.1.

(a) The commission shall require, after a hearing, every gas corporation to revise its transportation tariffs and conditions of service to eliminate all components that assess shippers of gas produced in California for the costs of interstate transmission of gas produced outside of this state. These revisions shall eliminate direct or indirect charges for the interstate transportation of gas produced outside of this state, commonly referred to as “double demand” charges.

(b) The
 commission shall consider and approve tariffs consistent with subdivision (a) on or before October 1, 1994.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the commission from approving intrastate transmission tariffs which include interstate transition cost surcharges, as described in commission decisions 91-11-025 and 92-07-025, in an appropriate manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 732, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

785.2.

The commission shall investigate, as part of the rate proceeding for any gas corporation, impediments to the in-state production and storage of natural gas. The commission may adopt a tariff that encourages in-state production or storage of natural gas, including, but not limited to, reducing local transmission rates applicable to in-state gas blends, unless the commission finds that adopting the tariff will likely result in consequences adverse to the interests of gas customers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 771, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

785.5.

(a) The commission shall require every gas corporation to adopt and pursue purchasing and procurement practices which assure its customers the lowest rates consistent with security of supply and with Section 785.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission may establish and periodically revise for each gas corporation guidelines for priorities among suppliers and sources of supply of gas to gas corporations, taking into consideration the requirements of Section 785. The establishment of these guidelines does not relieve a gas corporation of any requirement to make
 reasonable and prudent purchases of gas or diminish the authority of the commission to review the reasonableness of any purchase or procurement decision of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1380, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

785.7.

(a) No gas corporation shall charge, directly or indirectly, a higher rate for the transportation of gas produced in this state than for the transportation of gas from any other source. No gas corporation shall require a producer of gas or a customer for whom any gas transportation service is performed to utilize the corporation’s services or facilities either to deliver gas from the producer’s facility to the corporation’s gas plant or to process the gas to render it compatible with the corporation’s gas plant.

(b) If a producer of gas or customer delivers to the gas
 corporation for transportation any gas requiring any processing service, including, but not limited to, dehydration, processing for extraction of liquids, or other purification, different from, or in addition to, that performed on other gas in the corporation’s gas plant, in order for that gas to be compatible with the gas plant, the gas corporation may impose a charge for any such service actually performed. If the gas corporation constructs new facilities at the request of the producer or customer exclusively to receive gas by the gas corporation’s gas plant, the gas corporation may impose a charge for the construction, operation, and maintenance of these facilities. The amount of the charge for the processing service or facilities authorized by this subdivision shall be established by the commission and shall be based on the actual expenses for the construction, operation, maintenance, labor, materials, and overhead involved in providing the specific service or facilities.

(c) For purposes of this section, “transportation” means the movement of gas from the point of receiving by the gas plant of a gas corporation to the point of delivery to the person or corporation for whom the transportation service is performed, including any related gathering or processing of the gas. The point of receiving by the gas plant is that point in the gas corporation’s existing plant which is nearest the source of the gas and which has receiving capacity, but does not include any new facility constructed by the gas corporation at the request of the producer or customer exclusively to receive that gas. The terms and conditions of receiving, for these purposes, shall be comparable to the gas corporation’s purchase contracts in the general area of the point of receiving.

(d) Subdivision (a) does not apply to exchanges of gas between a gas corporation and a producer of
 gas.

(e) The commission shall allow the gas corporation to fully recover all reasonable and prudent costs associated with ownership and operation of the gas plant used for transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 733, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

786.

(a) On or before March 1, 1984, and annually thereafter, every telephone corporation operating within a service area shall issue to each of its residential subscribers, in a manner and form approved by the commission, a listing of the residential telephone services it provides, the rates or charges for those services, and the state or federal regulatory agency or agencies responsible for regulation of those services. 

(b) On or before March 1, 1988, and annually thereafter, every telephone corporation operating within a service area providing public telephone service shall
 provide to each of its residential subscribers, in a manner and form approved by the commission, a description of that public telephone service and the telephone corporation’s policies for providing that service, which shall include policies of public need and safety. The description shall also specify how a customer or subscriber can contact the telephone corporation by telephone or mail, or both, for additional information concerning these public telephone policies or for assistance regarding a specific public telephone. The commission shall require that this information be published separately from, but transmitted to subscribers together with, the information specified in subdivision (a). 

This subdivision does not apply to any corporation or person which owns or operates coin-activated telephone equipment available for public use but which is not a telephone corporation. 

(c) Every charge imposed
 on business or residential telephone subscribers in response to rules or regulations of the Federal Communications Commission shall be shown separately from other charges on a subscriber’s billing statement. Every telephone corporation operating within a service area shall do either of the following: 

(1) Identify these charges, by asterisk or other means, with the following phrase: 
THIS CHARGE IS (or THESE CHARGES ARE) IMPOSED BY ACTION OF THE FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION. 
(2) Include in the subscriber’s billing statement a listing of the total charges imposed pursuant to tariff of the Federal Communications Commission identified with the following phrase: 
TOTAL CHARGES IMPOSED BY ACTION OF THE FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION.
The billing statement shall also provide the address and telephone number of the Federal Communications Commission to which inquiries may be directed. 

(d) The commission shall, by rule or order, specify methods for compliance with this section, which shall include all of the following: 

(1) An explanation of the configuration of telecommunications services in California following implementation of the final decision of the United States District Court for the District of Columbia circuit in the case of United States v. American Telephone and Telegraph Company (552 F. Supp. 131) decided on August 19, 1982, and the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the regulatory agencies responsible for the regulation of intrastate and interstate telephone service. 

(2) A general
 description of the services provided by the telephone corporation or telecommunications provider issuing the explanation, how those services may be obtained, and a notice that other providers are available. 

(3) A description of billing charges which may appear on the telephone corporation’s or the telecommunications provider’s billing statements. 

(4) Procedures the subscribers, including subscribers equipped with telephone devices for the handicapped, may follow to protest items billed to the subscriber, and how to contact the telephone corporation or the telecommunications provider concerning those charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 134, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

787.

(a) Any public utility, or its contractor, to whom an excavation permit has been issued by any local agency for the installation, removal, maintenance, or repair of underground facilities may backfill the permitted excavation in any public road or highway with native spoil if all of the following conditions are met: 

(1) The native spoil is competent spoil. 

(2) Compaction meets the local agency’s requirements using industry standards for testing compaction. 

(3) The public utility or its contractor has no physical evidence of, or substantial reason to believe that there has been, contamination of the soil from hazardous wastes. 

(4) Within 30 days prior to compaction, a local agency has not provided the public utility or its contractor with physical evidence of, or substantial reason to believe that there has been, contamination of the soil from hazardous wastes. 

(b) If a local agency has determined through prior experience that the public utility that is applying for, or benefiting from, the excavation permit has previously neglected to adequately fill or compact prior excavations, whether directly or through its contractors, the local agency may, as a condition of the excavation permit do either or both of the following: 

(1) Require the public utility to
 post a bond, with a term not exceeding one year, amounting to two times the cost for the local agency to repair the backfill work, if done improperly, or any related collateral damage. 

(2) Require the public utility to submit a report from a registered soils engineer that the proper compaction of the excavation has been achieved. 

(c) For purposes of this section: 

(1) “Competent spoil” means soils that can be treated to bring their moisture content into the optimum range, and that can achieve the compaction required by the local agency. 

(2) “Local agency” means any city or county agency. 

(3) “Public utility” means any electrical corporation, gas corporation, heat corporation, water
 corporation, telephone corporation, pipeline corporation, sewer corporation, telegraph corporation, where the service is performed for, or the commodity delivered to, the public or any portion thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1060, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

788.

(a) This section applies only to a telephone corporation that is a provider of local exchange service.

(b) On or before March 1, 1992, and annually thereafter, every telephone corporation that is a provider of local exchange service shall issue to each of its residential subscribers, in a manner and form approved by the commission, a notice containing the following information:

(1) An explanation of the
 responsibilities of the subscriber and the telephone corporation in relation to the customer’s inside telephone wiring, as that term is defined by and pursuant to Section 1941.4 of the Civil Code, including an explanation of lessor and tenant obligations.

(2) An explanation of the telephone corporation’s procedures and charges for determining and notifying the subscriber of whether a malfunction in its telephone wire is located in the telephone network, or is located in the subscriber’s inside telephone wiring, including customer-provided equipment.

(3) If the telephone corporation offers any services to maintain or repair a subscriber’s inside telephone wiring, a full description of the types of services offered, including the rates, charges, and conditions for these services, and whether those services are offered by nonutility providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Water Utility Infrastructure, Plant and Facilities [789. - 790.1.]

789.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Water Utility Infrastructure Improvement Act of 1995.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 431, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

789.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Water corporations currently are faced with, and will continue to be faced with, increasing demands for new infrastructure, plant, and facilities to comply with increasingly strict state and federal safe drinking water laws and regulations.

(b) The state’s limited water supply will require investment by water corporations in infrastructure, plant, and facilities to develop new sources of supply, make existing sources of supply more reliable, and encourage and implement water conservation measures including water reclamation and reuse.

(c) Water corporations also are faced with the need to replace or upgrade water infrastructure, plant, and facilities and to design and construct all of those replacements and improvements to meet the governing fire flow standards for public fire protection purposes.

(d) Water corporations may, from time to time, own real property that once was, but is no longer, necessary or useful in the provision of water utility service and that now may be sold. It is the policy of the state that water corporations be encouraged to dispose of real property that once was, but is no longer, necessary or useful in the provision of water utility service and to invest the net proceeds therefrom in utility infrastructure, plant, facilities, and properties that are necessary or useful in the provision of water service to the public.
